zh-TW: 藝術/娛樂 > 嗜好和創作藝術 > 收藏品 > 武器收藏品 > 收藏用刀具: 客製化收藏用刀具; 收藏用直刀; 收藏用折疊刀; 收藏用獵刀; 收藏用口袋小刀; 收藏用戰術刀
fi: Taide ja viihde > Harrastukset ja taiteet > Keräilykohteet > Keräilyaseistus > Keräilyveitset: Mukautetut keräilyveitset; Kiinteäteräiset keräilyveitset; Keräilytaittoveitset; Metsästyskeräilyveitset; Keräilytaskuveitset; Taktiset keräilyveitset
it: Arte e svago > Hobby e arti creative > Collezionismo > Armi da collezione > Coltelli da collezione: Coltelli da collezione personalizzati; Coltelli da collezione a lama fissa; Coltelli da collezione a lama pieghevole; Coltelli da caccia da collezione; Coltelli tascabili da collezione; Coltelli tattici da collezione
pt-BR: Artes e entretenimento > Hobbies e artes > Artigos colecionáveis > Armas colecionáveis > Facas colecionáveis: Facas colecionáveis personalizadas; Canivetes colecionáveis de lâmina fixa; Canivetes colecionáveis dobráveis; Facas colecionáveis de caça; Canivetes de bolso colecionáveis; Facas táticas colecionáveis
nb: Kunst og underholdning > Hobby og kreativitet > Samleobjekter > Samlevåpen > Samlekniver: Spesialtilpassede samlekniver; Samlekniver med fast blad; Sammenleggbare samlekniver; Samlekniver for jakt; Lommesamlekniver; Taktiske samlekniver
vi: Nghệ thuật và giải trí > Sở thích và nghệ thuật sáng tạo > Đồ sưu tầm > Vũ khí sưu tầm > Bộ dao sưu tập: Bộ dao sưu tập đặt làm; Bộ dao găm sưu tập; Bộ dao gấp sưu tập; Bộ dao săn sưu tập; Bộ dao bỏ túi sưu tập; Bộ dao chiến thuật sưu tập
sv: Konst och underhållning > Hobby och skapande > Samlarobjekt > Samlarvapen > Samlarknivar: Personlliga samlarknivar; Samlarknivar med fasta blad; Vikbara samlarknivar; Samlarjaktknivar; Samlarfickknivar; Taktiska samlarknivar
ko: 아트/엔터테인먼트 > 취미/예술 > 수집품 > 수집용 무기 > 수집용 칼: 커스텀 수집용 칼; 고정 칼날 수집용 칼; 접이식 수집용 칼; 수집용 사냥 칼; 수집용 포켓 나이프; 수집용 군용 칼
ja: 芸術・エンターテイメント > 趣味・コレクション > コレクションアイテム > コレクション用武器 > コレクション用ナイフ: カスタムコレクション用ナイフ; 固定刃コレクションナイフ; 折りたたみ式コレクション用ナイフ; ハンティング用コレクションナイフ; ポケットコレクションナイフ; 戦術用コレクションナイフ
cs: Umění a zábava > Hobby, hudba a výtvarné umění > Sběratelské předměty > Sběratelské zbraně > Sběratelské nože: Sběratelské nože na zakázku; Sběratelské nože s pevnou čepelí; Sběratelské zavírací nože; Lovecké sběratelské nože; Kapesní sběratelské nože; Taktické sběratelské nože
en: Arts & Entertainment > Hobbies & Creative Arts > Collectibles > Collectible Weapons > Collectible Knives: Custom Collectible Knives; Fixed Blade Collectible Knives; Folding Collectible Knives; Hunting Collectible Knives; Pocket Collectible Knives; Tactical Collectible Knives
da: Kunst og underholdning > Hobby og håndarbejde > Samleobjekter > Samlervåben > Samlerknive: Brugerdefinerede samlerknive; Samlerknive med faste blade; Sammenfoldelige samlerknive; Samlerknive til jagt; Samlerlommeknive; Taktiske samlerknive
fr: Arts et loisirs > Loisirs et arts créatifs > Articles de collection > Armes de collection > Couteaux de collection: Couteaux de collection personnalisés; Couteaux de collection à lame fixe; Couteaux de collection pliants; Couteaux de collection de chasse; Couteaux de collection de poche; Couteaux de collection tactiques
hu: Művészet és szórakoztatás > Hobbik és kreatív művészet > Gyűjtemények > Gyűjthető fegyverek > Gyűjthető kések: Egyedi gyűjthető kések; Rögzített pengés gyűjthető kések; Összecsukható gyűjthető kések; Vadászati gyűjthető kések; Zseb gyűjthető kések; Taktikai gyűjthető kések
zh-CN: 艺术与娱乐 > 爱好/艺术创作 > 收藏品 > 武器收藏品 > 收藏类刀具: 定制收藏类刀具; 固定刀片收藏类刀具; 折叠收藏类刀具; 狩猎收藏类刀具; 袖珍收藏类刀具; 战术收藏类刀具
pl: Sztuka i rozrywka > Hobby i sztuki piękne > Artykuły kolekcjonerskie > Broń kolekcjonerska > Noże kolekcjonerskie: Niestandardowe noże kolekcjonerskie; Noże kolekcjonerskie z ostrzem stałym; Składane noże kolekcjonerskie; Myśliwskie noże kolekcjonerskie; Kieszonkowe noże kolekcjonerskie; Taktyczne noże kolekcjonerskie
sl-SI: Kultura in zabava > Hobiji in ustvarjalne umetnosti > Zbirateljski predmeti > Zbirateljsko orožje > Zbirateljski noži: Zbirateljski noži po meri; Zbirateljski noži s fiksnim rezilom; Zložljivi zbirateljski noži; Lovski zbirateljski noži; Žepni zbirateljski noži; Taktični zbirateljski noži
pt-PT: Artes e lazer > Passatempos e artes criativas > Objetos de coleção > Armas de coleção > Facas de coleção: Facas de coleção personalizadas; Facas de coleção de lâmina fixa; Facas de coleção dobráveis; Facas de caça de coleção; Facas de bolso de coleção; Facas de coleção táticas
hr-HR: Umjetnost i zabava > Hobiji i kreativne umjetnosti > Kolekcionarstvo > Kolekcionarsko oružje > Kolekcionarski noževi: Personalizirani kolekcionarski noževi; Kolekcionarski noževi s fiksnom oštricom; Sklopivi kolekcionarski noževi; Kolekcionarski lovački noževi; Kolekcionarski džepni noževi; Taktički kolekcionarski noževi
nl: Kunst en entertainment > Hobby's en creatieve vaardigheden > Verzamelobjecten > Wapens voor verzamelaars > Messen voor verzamelaars: Op maat gemaakte messen voor verzamelaars; Messen met vast blad voor verzamelaars; Inklapbare messen voor verzamelaars; Jachtmessen voor verzamelaars; Zakmessen voor verzamelaars; Tactische messen voor verzamelaars
ro-RO: Artă și divertisment > Hobby-uri și artă > Obiecte de colecție > Arme de colecție > Cuțite de colecție: Cuțite de colecție personalizate; Cuțite de colecție cu lamă fixă; Cuțite de colecție cu lamă pliabilă; Cuțite de vânătoare de colecție; Cuțite de colecție de buzunar; Cuțite de colecție tactice
bg-BG: Изкуства и развлечения > Хобита и творчески изкуства > Колекционерски предмети > Колекционерски оръжия > Колекционерски ножове: Персонализирани колекционерски ножове; Колекционерски ножове с фиксирано острие; Сгъваеми колекционерски ножове; Ловни колекционерски ножове; Джобни колекционерски ножове; Тактически колекционерски ножове
es: Arte y ocio > Hobbies y artes creativas > Coleccionables > Armas coleccionables > Cuchillos coleccionables: Cuchillos coleccionables personalizados; Cuchillos coleccionables de hoja fija; Cuchillos coleccionables plegables; Cuchillos coleccionables de caza; Cuchillos coleccionables de bolsillo; Cuchillos coleccionables militares
ru: Искусство и развлечения > Хобби и творчество > Коллекционные предметы > Коллекционное оружие > Коллекционные ножи: Авторские коллекционные ножи; Коллекционные ножи с фиксированным клинком; Складные коллекционные ножи; Охотничьи коллекционные ножи; Карманные коллекционные ножи; Тактические коллекционные ножи
de: Kunst & Unterhaltung > Hobby & Kunst > Sammlerstücke > Sammlerwaffen > Sammlermesser: Maßgefertigte Sammelmesser; Sammlermesser mit feststehender Klinge; Sammlermesser mit klappbarer Klinge; Jagdsammelmesser; Sammler-Taschenmesser; Taktische Sammlermesser
lt-LT: Menai ir pramogos > Hobiai ir menai > Kolekcionuojami daiktai > Kolekciniai ginklai > Kolekciniai peiliai: Vienetiniai kolekciniai peiliai; Kolekciniai peiliai fiksuota geležte; Lenktiniai kolekciniai peiliai; Medžiokliniai kolekciniai peiliai; Kišeniniai kolekciniai peiliai; Taktiniai kolekciniai peiliai
th: ศิลปะและความบันเทิง > งานอดิเรกและศิลปะสร้างสรรค์ > ของสะสม > อาวุธสะสม > มีดสะสม: มีดสะสมแบบปรับแต่งเอง; มีดสะสมแบบใบมีดคงที่; มีดสะสมแบบพับได้; มีดสะสมสำหรับล่าสัตว์; มีดสะสมพกพา; มีดสะสมทางยุทธวิธี
el: Τέχνες & Ψυχαγωγία > Χόμπι & Δημιουργικές Τέχνες > Συλλεκτικά αντικείμενα > Συλλεκτικά όπλα > Συλλεκτικά μαχαίρια: Προσαρμοσμένα συλλεκτικά μαχαίρια; Συλλεκτικά μαχαίρια με σταθερή λεπίδα; Πτυσσόμενα συλλεκτικά μαχαίρια; Κυνηγετικά συλλεκτικά μαχαίρια; Συλλεκτικά μαχαίρια τσέπης; Συλλεκτικά μαχαίρια τακτικής
tr: Sanat ve Eğlence > Hobiler ve Sanatsal Çalışmalar > Koleksiyonlar > Koleksiyonluk Silahlar > Koleksiyonluk Bıçaklar: Özel Koleksiyon Bıçakları; Sabit Bıçaklı Koleksiyonluk Bıçaklar; Katlanır Koleksiyonluk Bıçaklar; Avcılık Koleksiyonluk Bıçaklar; Cep Koleksiyonluk Bıçaklar; Taktiksel Koleksiyonluk Bıçaklar
sk-SK: Umenie a zábava > Záľuby a tvorivé dielne > Zberateľské predmety > Zberateľské zbrane > Zberateľské nože: Na mieru vyrobené zberateľské nože; Zberateľské nože s pevnou čepeľou; Skladacie zberateľské nože; Poľovnícke zberateľské nože; Vreckové zberateľské nože; Taktické zberateľské nože